Utah statutes.
53A-15-202.   Powers of the board.

The State Board of Education:

(1)  shall establish minimum standards for career and technical education programs in the public education system;

(2)  may apply for, receive, administer, and distribute funds made available through programs of federal and state governments to promote and aid career and technical education;

(3)  shall cooperate with federal and state governments to administer programs which promote and maintain career and technical education;

(4)  shall cooperate with the Utah College of Applied Technology, Salt Lake Community College's School of Applied Technology, Snow College, and Utah State University-College of Eastern Utah to ensure that students in the public education system have access to career and technical education at Utah College of Applied Technology campuses, Salt Lake Community College's School of Applied Technology, Snow College, and Utah State University-College of Eastern Utah;

(5)  shall require that before a minor student may participate in clinical experiences as part of a health care occupation program at a high school or other institution to which the student has been referred, the student's parent or legal guardian has:

(a)  been first given written notice through appropriate disclosure when registering and prior to participation that the program contains a clinical experience segment in which the student will observe and perform specific health care procedures that may include personal care, patient bathing, and bathroom assistance; and

(b)  provided specific written consent for the student's participation in the program and clinical experience; and

(6)  shall, after consulting with school districts, charter schools, the Utah College of Applied Technology, Salt Lake Community College's School of Applied Technology, Snow College, and Utah State University-College of Eastern Utah, prepare and submit an annual report to the governor and to the Legislature's Education Interim Committee by October 31 of each year detailing:

(a)  how the career and technical education needs of secondary students are being met; and

(b)  what access secondary students have to programs offered:

(i)  at applied technology colleges; and

(ii)  within the regions served by Salt Lake Community College's School of Applied Technology, Snow College, and Utah State University-College of Eastern Utah.



Amended by Chapter 211, 2010 General Session

